Tennessee, session 114, SB0411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-42-101(3), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(J) "State employee" also includes, solely for the purposes of this chapter and
under §§ 9-8-112 and 9-8-307:
(1) The board of supervisors and other officers, employees, and agents
of a soil and water conservation district; and
(2) Persons designated by a soil and water conservation district as
participants in volunteer programs authorized by a soil and water conservation
district.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0411
001779
- 1 -